Tennessee, session 114, HB0678.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-108(6), is amended by deleting
"annual report" in the first sentence and substituting "annual report by February 1".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0678
002328
- 1 -